src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection
!! ---------------
!! The UNDEFINED language nouns inflect in cases.

LEXICON mi
+N+Msc+Sg+Indef: # ;
+N+Msc+Sg+Def:%>i # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Indef:%>e # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Def:%>et # ;

LEXICON mu
+N+Msc+Sg+Indef: # ;
+N+Msc+Sg+Def:%>u # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Indef:%>j # ;
+N+Msc+Pl+Def:%>jtë # ;

LEXICON f
+N+Fem+Sg+Indef: # ;
+N+Fem+Sg+Def:%>a # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Indef:%>a # ;
+N+Fem+Pl+Def:%>at # ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
