src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
!! Nouns
!! -----
!! Nouns in UNDEFINED language are things.

LEXICON Nouns
mal mi "mountain"  ; !masc pl i
zog mu "bird" ; !masc pl u
vajzë f "girl" ; !fem

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
